Massachusetts, session 194th, S2665.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 19C and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 19C. It shall be unlawful for any employer knowingly to employ any alien in the
commonwealth, who is a student or visitor or, who has not been admitted to the United States for
permanent residence, except those whose status includes work authorization, or unless the
employment of such alien is authorized by the attorney general of the United States. An
employer shall not be deemed to have violated this section if he has made a bona fide inquiry
whether a person hereafter employed or referred by him is a citizen or an alien, and if an alien,
whether he is lawfully admitted to the United States for permanent residence, or admitted with a
status that includes work authorization, or is authorized by the attorney general of the United
States to accept employment.
of 2

The commissioner shall promulgate regulations specifying the procedure to be followed
by each employer to insure compliance with the provisions of this section.
Except as required by federal law, an employer is required to notify current employees by
posting notice of an inspection of I-9 employment eligibility verification forms or other
employment records conducted by a government agency within 72 hours of receiving the federal
notice of inspection.
Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be punished by a fine of not
more than five hundred nor less than two hundred dollars.
of 2